District of Columbia statutes.
20-1107

Distribution to fiduciary for nonresident person under legal disability other than minority.

If a fiduciary has been appointed for a nonresident person under a legal disability other than minority and if such fiduciary has filed copies of such appointment and an order authorizing such fiduciary to receive such distribution authenticated pursuant to 28 U.S.C. sec. 1738 , the personal representative may distribute the share of an estate of the person with a disability to such fiduciary.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 34(c), 53 DCR 6198

History

1981 Ed., § 20-1107.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 16-305 substituted “share of an estate of the person with a disability” for “disabled person’s share of an estate”.

Effect of Amendments